Utah statutes.
36-21-1.   Definition -- Deadline for state governmental entities filing legislation -- Waiver.

(1)  "Governmental entity" means:

(a)  the executive branch of the state, including all departments, institutions, boards, divisions, bureaus, offices, commissions, committees, and elected officials;

(b)  the judicial branch of the state, including the courts, the Judicial Council, the Office of the Court Administrator, and similar administrative units in the judicial branch;

(c)  the State Board of Education, the State Board of Regents, and any state-funded institution of higher education or public education;

(d)  the National Guard;

(e)  all quasi independent entities created by statute; and

(f)  any political subdivision of the state, including any county, city, town, school district, public transit district, redevelopment agency, special improvement or taxing district.

(2)  Legislation requested by a governmental entity may not be considered by the Legislature during the annual general session unless:

(a)  at the time the request for legislation is made it has a legislative sponsor;

(b)  the request for legislation is filed with the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel by December 1st of the year immediately before the Legislature's annual general session; and

(c)  at the time the request for legislation is filed, it includes the purpose of the measure and all necessary drafting information.

(3)  The Legislature, by motion and with the approval of a majority vote in one house, may waive this requirement.

(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that these agency requests will not be given higher priority than individual legislative requests filed at a later date.



Enacted by Chapter 44, 1995 General Session

